Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 5
Water Pollution Control Facilities

Subchapter 1
— General Provisions

[Reserved.]

Subchapter 2
— Wastewater Treatment Plants

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1997, No. 1219, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent. With Act 1230 of 1991, the General Assembly sought to delineate the respective responsibilities of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission and the Arkansas Department of Pollution Control & Ecology. Confusion on these issues in the public’s perception continues, however, primarily because of the similarity in the names of these entities. The purpose of this Act is to achieve the legislative intent of Act 1230 of 1991 and to definitively assign the executive, adjudicatory, and rulemaking roles for the State’s regulatory functions concerning protection of the environment.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1997, No. 179, § 38: Feb. 17, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 10 of the First Extraordinary Session of 1995 abolished the Joint Interim Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and in its place established the House Interim Committee and Senate Interim Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor; that various sections of the Arkansas Code refer to the Joint Interim Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and should be corrected to refer to the House and Senate Interim Committees on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor; that this act so provides; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order to make the laws compatible as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 288, § 5: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of this act are of major importance to the state's best interest to have all revenues of the Department of Pollution Control and Ecology deposited into the State Treasury for better accountability of financial resources. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-5-201. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commission” means the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission or its successor;

[Repealed.]

“License” means a certificate of competency issued by the Division of Environmental Quality to operators who have met the requirements of the licensing program;

“Licensing committee” means the committee of operators and technicians established in this subchapter to assist and advise the division in the examining and licensing of operators;

“Operator” means any person who is in responsible charge of the operation of a wastewater treatment plant, in whole or in part, and who, during the performance of his or her regular duties, exercises individual judgment which directly or indirectly may affect the proper operation of the wastewater treatment plant.

“Operator” shall not be deemed to include an official solely exercising general administrative supervision; and

“Wastewater treatment plant” means any plant, disposal field, lagoon, pumping station, or other works:

That use chemical or biological processes for:

Treating, stabilizing, or disposing of sewage, industrial wastewaters, or other wastewaters; or

The reduction and handling of sludge removed from such wastewater; and

From which:

A discharge to the waters of the state occurs; or

Municipal wastewater is land-applied.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 211, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1984; Acts 1997, No. 1219, § 7; 1999, No. 719, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, § 39; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2553, 2554.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment repealed (2); substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “department” in (3); and substituted “division” for “department” in (4).

8-5-202. Penalty and injunctions.

A violation of any provision of this subchapter or of any rule issued pursuant to this subchapter shall constitute a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punishable as such. Each day's continuance of a violation shall constitute a separate offense.

Any violation of this subchapter shall be subject to injunction proceedings brought by the Division of Environmental Quality in a court of competent jurisdiction.

A violation of any provision of this subchapter or of any rule promulgated under this subchapter is grounds for an administrative revocation or suspension of the operator's license by the division.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 211, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1991; Acts 1997, No. 1219, § 7; 2005, No. 729, § 1; 2019, No. 315, §§ 502, 503; 2019, No. 910, § 2555.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “or regulation” following “or of any rule” in (a) and (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b); and substituted “division” for “department” in (c).

Cross References.

Misdemeanors, § 5-1-107.

8-5-203. Unlawful actions.

It shall be unlawful for any municipality, governmental subdivision, public or private corporation, or other person to operate a public or private wastewater treatment plant unless the competency of the operator is duly licensed by the Division of Environmental Quality under the provisions of this subchapter. It shall further be unlawful for any person to perform the duties of an operator of any such wastewater treatment plant without being duly licensed under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 211, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1990; Acts 1991, No. 1103, § 1; 1997, No. 1219, § 7; 2019, No. 910, § 2556.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality”.

8-5-204. Licensing committee.

There is created and established a licensing committee to advise and assist the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission and the Division of Environmental Quality in the administration of the licensing program.

The committee shall be composed of eight (8) members:

Five (5) members, to be appointed by the commission, of which three (3) members shall be active wastewater treatment plant operators licensed by the commission and two (2) members shall be employed by a private corporation or industry located in Arkansas and nominated at large by the corporations or industries for service on the committee;

One (1) member, to be appointed by the commission, shall be an employee of a municipality operating a wastewater treatment plant who holds the position of chief administrative officer, city engineer, director of public utilities, or other equivalent position;

One (1) member, to be appointed by the commission, shall be a faculty member of an accredited college, university, or professional school in this state whose major field is related to water resources or sanitary engineering; and

One (1) member shall be the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality or a qualified member of his or her staff who shall act as executive secretary of the committee.

In the event of a vacancy, a new member shall be appointed by the commission to serve out the unexpired term.

No member shall serve more than two (2) consecutive three-year terms.

State agency members of the committee shall receive no additional salary or per diem for their services as members of the committee, but they may receive expense reimbursement in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.

The members appointed by the commission may receive expense reimbursement and stipends in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 211, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1988; Acts 1993, No. 556, § 1; 1997, No. 250, § 46; 1997, No. 697, § 2; 1997, No. 1219, § 7; 1999, No. 719, §§ 2, 3; 1999, No. 1164, § 40; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2557, 2558.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(1) and (a)(2)(D).

8-5-205. Powers and duties generally.

The Division of Environmental Quality or its successor shall be charged with the responsibility of administering and enforcing this subchapter, with the advice and assistance of the licensing committee, and is given and charged with the following powers and duties:

To conduct examinations for licensing, which shall be conducted at least annually and more frequently as the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall deem necessary;

To issue licenses to qualified wastewater treatment plant operators, to renew those licenses, and to suspend or revoke the licenses for cause, after due notice and hearing;

To institute court proceedings to compel compliance with the provisions of this subchapter and the rules issued pursuant thereto; and

To participate financially in programs sponsored by the Arkansas Water Environment Association, Inc. or its successor, provided that the participation shall not exceed the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per fiscal year.

The commission shall serve as the rulemaking and appointment authority for implementation of this subchapter.

The commission’s powers shall include:

To adopt rules implementing and effectuating this subchapter as may be necessary for the administration and enforcement thereof;

To make appointments to the committee in accordance with this subchapter; and

To set reasonable licensure and examination fees to cover the costs of administration of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 211, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1985; Acts 1993, No. 556, § 2; 1997, No. 1219, § 7; 1999, No. 1164, § 41; 2019, No. 315, § 504; 2019, No. 910, § 2559.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “To adopt rules” in (b)(2)(A).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language of (a).

8-5-206. Classification of wastewater treatment plants.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall, through rules, classify all wastewater treatment plants, taking into account:

The size, type, and complexity of the wastewater treatment plant;

The character and volume of wastewater treated;

The population served;

The skill, knowledge, and experience reasonably required to supervise the proper operation of the wastewater treatment plant; and

Such other factors as the commission shall deem appropriate.

The Division of Environmental Quality shall license persons as to their qualifications to supervise successfully the proper operation of wastewater treatment plants within classifications based on the recommendations of the licensing committee.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 211, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1987; Acts 1997, No. 1219, § 7; 2019, No. 315, § 505; 2019, No. 910, § 2560.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in the introductory language of (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b).

8-5-207. Operators to be licensed.

In order to safeguard the public health and protect the waters of this state from pollution, all operators in responsible charge of public or private wastewater treatment plants shall be duly licensed and certified as competent by the Division of Environmental Quality under the provisions of this subchapter and under such rules as the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission may adopt, with the advice and assistance of the licensing committee, pursuant to the authority of this subchapter. All rules promulgated pursuant to this subchapter shall be reviewed by the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor or appropriate subcommittees of the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 211, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1983; Acts 1991, No. 1103, § 2; 1997, No. 179, § 2; 1997, No. 1219, § 7; 2019, No. 315, § 506; 2019, No. 910, § 2561.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “such rules” in the first sentence, and deleted “and regulations” following “All rules” in the second sentence.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality”.

8-5-208. License requirements.

The Division of Environmental Quality shall license and certify all applicants for licenses under this subchapter who satisfy the requirements of this subchapter and the rules issued pursuant to this subchapter. Licenses shall be granted according to the classification of wastewater treatment plants established under this subchapter. Licenses shall be valid for a period of two (2) years and shall be renewable upon application without examination.

All operators of wastewater treatment plants within the state shall apply to the division for a license.

In its discretion, the division may waive the requirements or any part of the requirements for formal examination of an applicant for license if the applicant holds a valid license or certificate from another state in which the requirements for license in the appropriate classification are at least equal to the requirements set forth in this subchapter and the rules issued pursuant to this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 211, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1986; Acts 1997, No. 1219, § 7; 2005, No. 729, § 2; 2007, No. 544, § 1; 2019, No. 315, §§ 507, 508; 2019, No. 910, § 2562.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment substituted “two (2) years” for “one (1) year” in (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” preceding “issued pursuant” in (a) and (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b) and (c).

8-5-209. Fees — Wastewater Licensing Fund.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall have the authority to set fees in an amount to cover the cost of the administration of this subchapter.

Licensing and examination fees shall be set forth by rule.

However, the licensing and examination fees shall not exceed:

A combined examination and license fee of forty dollars ($40.00); and

An annual license renewal fee of twenty dollars ($20.00).

All fees collected under this section shall be deposited into the Wastewater Licensing Fund and may be used only for the administration of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 211, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1989; Acts 1991, No. 1104, § 1; 1997, No. 288, § 1; 1997, No. 1219, § 7; 1999, No. 777, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 509; 2019, No. 693, § 11.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (a)(2)(A).

The 2019 amendment by No. 693 substituted “by” for “in the” in (a)(2)(A); inserted “licensing and examination” in the introductory language of (a)(2)(B); and rewrote (b).

Cross References.

Wastewater Licensing Fund, § 19-5-1071.

Subchapter 3
— Water Pollution Control Projects — Grants and Bonds

Effective Dates.

Acts 2003, No. 548, § 5: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that administration of the clean water fund is of critical importance to the citizens of Arkansas, that the fund may be administered more efficiently by an agency that specializes in the administration of numerous other revolving loan programs associated with environmental projects, and that the provisions of this act are necessary to preserve and improve the efficient administration of these programs. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2003.”

Cross References.

Municipal water and sewer revenue bonds issued to refund revenue bonds, § 14-72-101.

8-5-301 — 8-5-319. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter was repealed by Acts 2003, No. 548, § 4. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

8-5-301. Acts 1971, No. 108, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1914.

8-5-302. Acts 1971, No. 108, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1914.1.

8-5-303. Acts 1971, No. 108, § 3; 1971, No. 544, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1914.2.

8-5-304. Acts 1971, No. 108, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1914.3.

8-5-305. Acts 1971, No. 108, § 5; 1975, No. 225, § 21; 1981, No. 425, § 20; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1914.4.

8-5-306. Acts 1971, No. 108, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1914.5.

8-5-307. Acts 1971, No. 108, § 7; 1975, No. 225, § 21; 1981, No. 425, § 20; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1914.6.

8-5-308. Acts 1971, No. 108, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1914.7.

8-5-309. Acts 1971, No. 108, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1914.8.

8-5-310. Acts 1971, No. 108, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1914.9.

8-5-311. Acts 1971, No. 108, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1914.10.

8-5-312. Acts 1971, No. 108, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1914.11.

8-5-313. Acts 1971, No. 108, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1914.12.

8-5-314. Acts 1971, No. 108, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1914.13.

8-5-315. Acts 1971, No. 108, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1914.14.

8-5-316. Acts 1971, No. 108, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1914.15.

8-5-317. Acts 1971, No. 108, § 17; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1914.16.

8-5-318. Acts 1971, No. 108, § 18; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1914.17.

8-5-319. Acts 1989, No. 701, § 1; 1993, No. 3, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, § 42.

Subchapter 4
— Water Pollution Control State Grant Act

Effective Dates.

Acts 2003, No. 548, § 5: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that administration of the clean water fund is of critical importance to the citizens of Arkansas, that the fund may be administered more efficiently by an agency that specializes in the administration of numerous other revolving loan programs associated with environmental projects, and that the provisions of this act are necessary to preserve and improve the efficient administration of these programs. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2003.”

8-5-401 — 8-5-404. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter was repealed by Acts 2003, No. 548, § 4. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

8-5-401. Acts 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 64, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1915.

8-5-402. Acts 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 64, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1915.1.

8-5-403. Acts 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 64, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1915.2; Acts 1999, No. 1164, § 43.

8-5-404. Acts 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 64, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1915.2; Acts 1999, No. 1164, § 44.

Subchapter 5
— Underground Salt Water Disposal Systems

Effective Dates.

Acts 2011, No. 791, § 11: Jan. 1, 2012.

Preambles.

Acts 1969, No. 254 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, some individuals, partnerships and corporations are operating oil wells and have been purporting to inject salt water back into the ground and claiming tax exemptions as allowed under Acts 57 and 138 of Acts of the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas, of 1959; and

“Whereas, while claiming tax exemptions some have been violating the provisions of said acts and have been discharging salt water and waste oil into streams and at such places that the same have been seeping and going into branches and streams; and

“Whereas, the Pollution Control Commission seems to be unable under the present laws and rules to control pollution; and

“Whereas, its employees cannot properly enforce orders against pollution; and

“Whereas, the 5-year plan entered into in 1957 has failed to stop pollution; and

“Whereas, more definite rules are needed;

“Now, therefore….”

8-5-501. Regulation of systems generally.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission and the Oil and Gas Commission are empowered to establish reasonable rules and specifications for the establishment and operation of underground salt water disposal systems to be used in disposing of salt water produced in the production of oil.

Any person wishing to establish an approved underground salt water disposal system shall make application to the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission and the Oil and Gas Commission for a permit to construct and operate the underground salt water disposal system for the purpose of obtaining the benefits of the provisions of this section, §§ 8-5-502, 26-58-201 — 26-58-204, 26-58-206, 26-58-207 [repealed], 26-58-208 — 26-58-210, and 26-58-211 [repealed].

The application shall include:

A description of the underground salt water disposal system that is to be established;

The plans and specifications thereof;

The location of the underground salt water disposal system and the number and location of the salt water producing oil wells to be served by the underground salt water disposal system;

The name of each oil producer to be served;

A description of the underground level or strata into which the salt water is to be injected; and

Such other information as may be required by rules of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission and the Oil and Gas Commission.

If the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission and the Oil and Gas Commission determine that the underground salt water disposal system for which application is made will meet the requirements of this section, §§ 8-5-502, 26-58-201 — 26-58-204, 26-58-206, 26-58-207 [repealed], 26-58-208 — 26-58-210, and 26-58-211 [repealed], and the rules of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission and the Oil and Gas Commission, a permit for the establishment of the underground salt water disposal system shall be issued.

Upon the completion of the underground salt water disposal system, the commission granting the permit provided for in this section shall cause an inspection of the underground salt water disposal system to be made.

If the commission determines that the underground salt water disposal system is in compliance with the requirements of this section, §§ 8-5-502, 26-58-201 — 26-58-204, 26-58-206, 26-58-207 [repealed], 26-58-208 — 26-58-210, and 26-58-211 [repealed], and the rules of the commission, a certificate of approval of the underground salt water disposal system shall be granted.

The certificate of approval shall be signed by the chair and secretary of the commission.

Copies of the certificate of approval shall be furnished, upon application therefor, to each oil producer who disposes of salt water through such approved underground salt water disposal system.

The commission granting the certificate of approval shall, from time to time, inspect the approved underground salt water disposal system.

If a determination is made that the underground salt water disposal system is being operated in a manner contrary to the provisions of this section, §§ 8-5-502, 26-58-201 — 26-58-204, 26-58-206, 26-58-207 [repealed], 26-58-208 — 26-58-210, and 26-58-211 [repealed], or the rules of the commission, the commission may revoke the certificate of approval until such time as a showing may be made that the deficiencies in the underground salt water disposal system have been corrected to the satisfaction of the commission.

No oil producer shall be entitled to the benefits of the provisions of this section, §§ 8-5-502, 26-58-201 — 26-58-204, 26-58-206, 26-58-207 [repealed], 26-58-208 — 26-58-210, and 26-58-211 [repealed], during the period in which the certificate of approval is revoked.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 57, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 84-2116; Acts 2019, No. 315, §§ 510-514.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (a)(1); and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a)(2)(B)(vi), (b)(1), (b)(2)(B)(i), and (b)(3)(B)(i).

8-5-502. Penalty for violation of § 8-5-501.

Any person violating the provisions of § 8-5-501 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or be imprisoned not less than thirty (30) days nor more than one (1) year, or be both so fined and imprisoned.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 57, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 84-2120.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1959, No. 57, § 8, is also codified as § 26-58-203.

8-5-503. Denial of tax deductions.

Should any individual, partnership, corporation, or employee knowingly or negligently cause, let, or permit salt water to flow, seep, or otherwise escape from the leased premises, the rights of the party to claim tax deductions or credits under §§ 8-5-501, 8-5-502, 26-58-201 — 26-58-206, 26-58-207 [repealed], and 26-58-208 — 26-58-210, will be denied for a period of twelve (12) months.

Any individual can file a complaint before the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission against anyone for violations of this section and secure a hearing.

If the commission should find that the accused has violated this section, then the violator shall be denied any tax exemption for a period of one (1) year.

Any violation of this section during the period of the suspension shall extend the suspension one (1) year from the date of the last violation.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 254, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 84-2120.1 — 84-2120.3; Acts 2011, No. 791, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment substituted “§§ 8-5-501, 8-5-502, and 26-58-201 — 26-58-210” for “§§ 8-5-501, 8-5-502, 26-58-201 — 26-58-204, 26-58-206 — 26-58-210, and 26-58-211 [repealed]” in (a).

8-5-504. Chlorides standard.

Should the water of any stream of this state have more than two hundred fifty parts per million (250 ppm) of chlorides as a result of a violation of this subchapter, then the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall seek to learn of the source of the pollution and take steps to eliminate the source of pollution.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 254, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 84-2120.4; Acts 2003, No. 1180, § 1.

8-5-505. [Repealed.]

A.C.R.C. Notes.

This section, concerning fees, was derived from Acts 1959, No. 57, § 7. Acts 1959, No. 57, § 7 was also codified as § 26-58-211 [repealed]. Section 26-58-211 was repealed by Acts 1993, No. 344, § 2. The title of Acts 1993, No. 344 was “an act to repeal certain taxes and fees levied by Arkansas Code Annotated which generate minimal revenue and are an administrative burden on the state; and for other purposes.” Accordingly, it appears that this section was impliedly repealed by Acts 1993, No. 344, § 2.

Subchapter 6
— Arkansas Privatization Act

Effective Dates.

Acts 1985, No. 690, § 12: Mar. 28, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared by the General Assembly that historically a significant portion of the funding of the cost of construction of wastewater projects has been provided through grants from the United States of America and in recent years funds available to local governments for such grants have been substantially reduced thereby placing an increasingly intolerable burden on local governments to provide the cost of constructing and improving such sewer service and facilities and there is an immediate and pressing need to provide such service, and that alternate means of financing and acquisition are needed. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being immediately necessary for the protection of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect, and be in full force, immediately on its passage and approval.”

8-5-601. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and cited as the “Arkansas Privatization Act”.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 690, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1992.

8-5-602. Legislative policy.

The General Assembly declares that the policy of this state is to assure its citizens adequate public services, particularly wastewater projects, and solid waste disposal projects, at reasonable cost, and that such services are essential to the maintenance and general welfare of the citizens of this state and to the continued expansion of the state's economy, job market, and industrial base. However, the cost of constructing, owning, and operating capital facilities to meet the demand for those public services is becoming increasingly burdensome to cities, counties, and improvement districts, and it is desirable that innovative financing mechanisms be made available to assist the communities of this state in developing wastewater projects and solid waste disposal projects at reasonable cost. Private sector ownership and operation of capital facilities providing public services can result in cost savings to communities contracting for those public services. It is, therefore, in the best public interest of the state and its citizens that cities, counties, and improvement districts be authorized to cause such services to be provided by private enterprise and to contract with private owners or operators for providing the services to the public.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 690, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1992.1; Acts 1991, No. 629, § 1.

8-5-603. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Chief executive” means the mayor of a municipality, the county judge of a county, or the chair of an improvement district, commission, agency, or similar body;

“Clerk” means the city clerk or town recorder of a municipality, the county clerk of a county, or the secretary of the board of commissioners of an improvement district, commission, agency, or similar body;

“Cost” means the cost of acquiring, constructing, and financing any privatization project and placing the privatization project in service, including without limitation:

The cost of acquisition and construction of any facility or any modification, improvement, or extension of that facility;

Any cost incident to the acquisition of any necessary property, easement, or right-of-way;

Engineering or architectural fees, legal fees, and fiscal agents' and financial advisors' fees;

Any cost incurred for any preliminary planning to determine the economic and engineering feasibility of a proposed privatization project; and

Costs of economic investigations and studies, surveys, preparation of designs, plans, working drawings, specifications, and the inspection and supervision of the construction of any facility and any other cost incurred by the local government;

“Facility” means any structure, building, machinery, system, land, right, permit, or other property necessary or desirable for the ownership and operation of a wastewater project or solid waste disposal project, including without limitation, all related and appurtenant easements and rights-of-way, improvements, utilities, equipment, and furnishings;

“Local government” means a city or incorporated town in the State of Arkansas, any county in the State of Arkansas, an improvement district organized under the law of the State of Arkansas, or any other political subdivision, agency, or instrumentality of the State of Arkansas or any of the foregoing;

“Ordinance” means an ordinance, resolution, or other appropriate legislative enactment of the governing body of a local government;

“Private owner or operator” means a person, firm, corporation, or partnership that is not a public entity and which owns or operates a privatization project;

“Privatization” means any wastewater project or solid waste disposal project, including wastewater projects and solid waste disposal projects acquired from a local government, which is owned or operated by a private owner or operator and provides the related service to the public.

“Privatization” includes, but is not limited to:

The acquisition, construction, reconstruction, repair, alteration, modernization, renovation, improvement, or extension of any such wastewater project or solid waste disposal project, whether or not in existence or under construction, and financing the cost of those activities;

The purchase, installation, or financing of equipment, machinery, and other personal property required by such wastewater project or solid waste disposal project; and

The acquisition, improvement, or financing of real property and the extension or provision of utilities, access roads, and other appurtenant facilities, all of which are to be used or occupied by any person in providing wastewater projects or solid waste disposal projects;

“Solid waste” means all putrescible and nonputrescible wastes in solid or semisolid form, including, but not limited to, yard or food waste, waste glass, waste metals, waste plastics, wastepaper, waste paperboard, and all other solid and semisolid wastes resulting from industrial, commercial, agricultural, community, and residential activities;

“Solid waste disposal project” means any facility designed and operated for the disposition by landfilling, incinerating, composting, or other method of disposing of solid waste; and

“Wastewater project” means sewage collection systems and treatment plants, including without limitation, intercepting sewers, outfall sewers, force mains, pumping stations, instrumentation and control systems, and other appurtenances necessary or useful for the collection, removal, reduction, treatment, purification, disposal, and handling of liquid and solid waste, sewage and industrial waste, and refuse.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 690, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1992.2; Acts 1991, No. 629, §§ 2-4.

8-5-604. Construction.

This subchapter shall be construed liberally to effect its purposes and neither this subchapter nor anything contained in this subchapter is or shall be construed as a restriction or limitation upon any powers which any local government or private owner or operator might otherwise have under any laws of this state, and the provisions of this subchapter are cumulative to any such powers.

This subchapter does and shall be construed to provide a complete, additional, and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized thereby and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to other laws.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 690, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1992.8.

8-5-605. Applicability.

This subchapter does not apply to the disposition of surplus property by a local government, nor to any other action of a local government which is not connected with a privatization contract.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 690, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1992.5.

8-5-606. Privatization contracts generally.

Any local government may enter into a privatization contract with a private owner or operator to accomplish the transfer of any local government-owned wastewater project or solid waste disposal project or the designing, construction, operation, maintenance, or financing of cost, or any combination thereof, of a wastewater project or solid waste disposal project, pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter.

A local government considering entering into a privatization contract pertaining to its municipally owned wastewater project or solid waste disposal project, or any portion thereof, shall publish notice of its intention to adopt an ordinance to accomplish the privatization.

The notice shall:

Set forth a brief summary of the privatization contract provisions; and

Set a time and place for a public hearing to be conducted by the chief executive.

The notice shall be published in a newspaper having general circulation within the county in which a substantial portion of the wastewater project or solid waste disposal project is located by one (1) publication each week for a period of two (2) weeks. The first publication shall be not less than fourteen (14) days prior to the adoption of the ordinance approving the execution of the privatization contract.

The hearing may be held in conjunction with any hearing on the question of issuing bonds to finance the cost of the privatization project, on the question of adoption of the service agreement, or any other question.

A copy of the proposed privatization contract shall be filed as a public record with the clerk of the local government not less than two (2) weeks prior to the adoption of the ordinance.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 690, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1992.3; Acts 1991, No. 629, § 5.